Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 5 Boll Weevil Eradication

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 1079, § 2 provided for an effective date for this article as follows:

“This Act shall become effective July 1, 1985, for the purposes of certifying a cotton growers’ organization and conducting a referendum among cotton growers. For all other purposes, this Act shall not become effective until the states of Alabama and Florida have enacted a boll weevil eradication program similar to the program provided for in this Act.”

Alabama enacted a similar program in 1984. For Alabama law, see
§ 2-19-120 et seq., Code of Alabama 1975. Florida enacted a similar program in 1987. For Florida law, see
Fla. Stat. § 593.101 et seq. (1987), effective May 29, 1987.

By the terms of Ga. L. 1985, p. 1079, § 2, this article became effective May 29, 1987.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Boil Weevil eradication, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-24.

2-7-150.
Short title.

This article shall be cited as the “Georgia Boll Weevil Eradication Act of 1985.”

History.

Code 1981, §

2-7-150

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1079, § 1.

2-7-151.
Declaration of purpose.

The boll weevil,

Anthonomus grandis

Boheman, is declared to be a serious pest and a menace to the cotton-growing industry. The purpose of this article is to provide for the eradication of this pest.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-7-151

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1079, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, a hyphen was inserted between “cotton” and “growing” in the first sentence.

2-7-152.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Bale” means a running bale of cotton averaging 500 pounds.

(1.1)

“Boll weevil” means

Anthonomus grandis

Boheman in any stage of development.

“Certificate” means a document issued by the Commissioner certifying that a regulated article is free of the boll weevil.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture, any employee of the Department of Agriculture, or any other person authorized by the Commissioner to act in his or her behalf.

“Department” means the Georgia Department of Agriculture.

(4.1)

“First handler” means that person who owns or operates the gin where cotton is first delivered from the cotton grower.

“Host” means any plant, plant part, or product thereof, including cotton, which is capable of sustaining the boll weevil in the completion of any portion of its life cycle.

“Infested” means actually infested with the boll weevil or exposed to such an extent that it would be reasonable to expect that an infestation exists.

“Noncommercial cotton” means cotton intended for purposes other than processing.

“Permit” means a document issued or authorized by the Commissioner providing for the movement of regulated articles to restricted destinations for limited handling, use, or processing.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, company, society, association, or other business entity.

“Regulated article” means any article carrying or capable of carrying the boll weevil, including, but not limited to, cotton plants, seed cotton, hosts, gin trash, and equipment which may be designated by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-7-152

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1079, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1123, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 439, § 1/SB 43.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 1123, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act is not severable.
In the event any section, subsection, sentence, clause, or phrase of this Act shall be declared or adjudged invalid or unconstitutional, the other sections, subsections, sentences, clauses, or phrases of this Act shall automatically be repealed and Article 5 of Chapter 7 of Title 2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated in effect immediately prior to the enactment of this Act is reenacted as of such date as if this Act had not been enacted.
The General Assembly declares that it would not have passed the remaining parts of this Act if it had known that such part or parts hereof would be declared or adjudged invalid or unconstitutional.”

2-7-153.
Administration and enforcement by Commissioner.

The Commissioner is authorized to administer and enforce the provisions of this article through the utilization of personnel and facilities of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-7-153

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1079, § 1.

2-7-154.
Powers of Commissioner.

The Commissioner is authorized to:

Cooperate with and, as he may deem necessary, enter into written agreements with any other agency of this state, any agency of the federal government, any agency of another state, any person who may be engaged in the growing, processing, marketing, or handling of cotton, or any other person for the purpose of cost sharing or assignment of duties and responsibilities in destroying and eradicating the boll weevil in Georgia;

Inspect or cause to be inspected by duly authorized employees or agents any land, plants, plant products, or other articles, things, or substances that may, in his opinion, be capable of disseminating or carrying the boll weevil. For this purpose, the Commissioner or his employees and agents shall have the power to enter into or upon any place and to open any bundle, package, or other container containing or thought to contain any regulated article or other item capable of disseminating or carrying the boll weevil;

Require every person growing cotton in this state to furnish, on forms supplied by the Commissioner, such information as he may require relating to the size and location of all commercial and noncommercial cotton fields or patches being grown in this state;

Quarantine this state or any portion thereof or any other state or portion thereof when, after hearing, he determines that such action is necessary to prevent or reduce the spread of the boll weevil;

Adopt, after hearing, such rules as he deems necessary to prevent or reduce the spread of the boll weevil, including but not limited to rules:

Governing the movement of regulated articles into, out of, or within this state;

Establishing eradication zones within the state where eradication efforts will be undertaken;

Restricting or prohibiting the planting of cotton in eradication zones when he determines that it would jeopardize the success of the eradication effort or present a hazard to the public health or safety;

Requiring that all growers of commercial cotton in the designated eradication zones participate in the eradication program, including cost sharing through assessment;

Establishing penalty fees for those growers in eradication zones who fail to comply with the rules adopted by the Commissioner; or

Imposing restrictions on pasturing of livestock, entry by humans, and location of honeybee colonies in any eradication zone which has been or is to be treated with pesticides for eradication of the boll weevil or in any other area affected by such treatments;

Enter upon any premise, property, or field within an eradication zone and treat with pesticides or destroy any volunteer or noncommercial cotton when he determines that such action is necessary to the success of the eradication efforts;

Require the destruction of commercial cotton in an eradication zone when it is not being grown in compliance with the rules adopted under this article; and

Exempt from the assessment penalty requirements set forth in this article those cotton growers for whom paying the assessment penalties would impose an undue financial hardship. The Commissioner is authorized to establish, upon the recommendation of the cotton growers’ organization certified pursuant to Code Section 2-7-155, a payment plan in such hardship cases. This exemption shall be implemented as follows:

The Commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations defining the criteria to be used in determining financial hardship; provided, however, that no exemption shall be granted to any cotton grower who, after the amount of assessments and penalties otherwise due has been subtracted from his taxable net income, as defined in Code Section 48-7-27, has a net income exceeding $15,000.00 for the year in which he seeks an exemption;

Any cotton grower who claims an exemption shall apply on a form prescribed by the Commissioner. A separate application shall be filed for each calendar year in which a cotton grower claims an exemption. Each application shall contain an explanation of the conditions to be met for approval. An oath shall be included on the form and the form, upon completion, shall be returned to the Commissioner;

The Commissioner shall forward all completed exemption application forms to the cotton growers’ organization certified pursuant to Code Section 2-7-155. The certified growers’ organization shall determine from the information contained in the application forms whether or not the applicants qualify for a hardship exemption and may recommend a payment plan to the Commissioner; and

The certified cotton growers’ organization shall notify the Commissioner of its determination, which shall be binding upon the applicants. Upon receipt of the determination of the certified cotton growers’ organization, the Commissioner shall promptly notify each affected cotton grower of that determination. If an exemption has been denied, assessments and penalties for the year in which the application was made will become due at the time they would otherwise have become due had no application for exemption been filed or within 30 days after the date of the Commissioner’s notice of an adverse determination, whichever is later.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-7-154

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1079, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 452, § 1.

2-7-155.
Certification of cotton growers’ organization by Commissioner; effect of certification; powers of organization; liability.

The Commissioner is authorized to certify a cotton growers’ organization for the purpose of entering into agreements with the department, agencies of other states, the federal government, or any other person as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this article. In applying to the Commissioner for certification, the cotton growers’ organization shall demonstrate that:

It is a nonprofit organization within the meaning of Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Section 501(a));

Membership is open to all cotton growers in this state;

It has only one class of members and each member has only one vote;

Its board of directors consists of six cotton growers elected by the membership and one employee of the department;

All books and records of account and minutes of proceedings of the organization are available for inspection or audit by the Commissioner upon request at any reasonable time; and

Any employee or agent of the organization who handles its funds is adequately bonded.

If the Commissioner finds that the growers’ organization meets the requirements set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section, he shall certify the organization, in writing, for the purposes of this article only, and such certification shall not affect any other organization of cotton growers established for other purposes. The Commissioner is authorized to revoke such certification if at any time the organization fails to meet the certification requirements or the purposes of this article.

The certified cotton growers’ organization:

Shall be a public corporation and may contract and be contracted with, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts; and

Shall be governed by a board of directors which shall name its chairman, vice chairman, and secretary and determine a quorum for the transaction of its business.

The certified cotton growers’ organization is authorized to appoint advisory boards, special committees, legal counsel, and technical and clerical personnel to advise, aid, and assist the organization in the performance of its duties and to fix, if necessary, any compensation for such services.

The members, officers, and employees of the cotton growers’ organization operating under this article shall not be held individually responsible in any way whatsoever to any grower or other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts of omission or commission, other than their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No member, officer, or employee shall be held individually responsible for any act or omission of any other member of such organization. The liability of the members of the growers’ organization shall be several and not joint, and no member shall be liable for the default of any other member.

The certified cotton growers’ organization is authorized to borrow money or otherwise incur indebtedness and to expend the moneys so acquired for the purpose of destroying and eradicating the boll weevil in Georgia. Any indebtedness created pursuant to this paragraph shall be repaid from the assessments on cotton growers provided for in Code Section 2-7-156 or from other funds available to the certified cotton growers’ organization and shall not constitute a debt of the State of Georgia or any department, agency, political subdivision, official, or employee thereof. Funds borrowed under this paragraph may be expended by the certified cotton growers’ organization for the purpose of reducing the annual assessment or increasing the number of years over which cotton growers are required to pay assessments under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-7-155

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1079, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1086, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 9.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, “ 26 U.S.C. Section 501(a)” was substituted for “ 26 USC 501(a)” near the end of paragraph (a)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that this Act is applicable to taxable years ending on or after March 11, 1987, and that a taxpayer with a taxable year ending on or after January 1, 1987, and before March 11, 1987, may elect to have the provisions of that Act apply.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, also provided that tax, penalty, and interest liabilities and refund eligibility for prior taxable years shall not be affected by that Act.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, also provided that provisions of the federal Tax Reform Act of 1986 and of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 which as of January 1, 1987, were not yet effective become effective for purposes of Georgia taxation on the same dates as they become effective for federal purposes.

2-7-156.
Assessment for suppression and eradication programs; conditions.

An assessment shall be levied upon all cotton growers in this state to cover, in whole or in part, the cost of boll weevil suppression and eradication programs authorized by this article, subject to the following:

All assessments imposed on cotton shall be levied on a per acre or per bale basis as determined by the Commissioner upon recommendation of the cotton growers’ organization; provided, however, that the per acre assessment shall continue to be used so long as acreage certification is available to the department;

The per acre or per bale assessment, the period for which it shall be levied, and the geographical area to which the assessment applies shall be established by the Commissioner, upon recommendation by the board of directors of the cotton growers’ organization;

When the assessment is imposed on a per bale basis, it shall be the duty of each first handler of cotton from cotton growers in this state to collect the assessments imposed pursuant to this article on such cotton, to file reports on forms prescribed by the Commissioner listing such sales and the name of the grower, and to remit the amounts so imposed and collected to the Commissioner within 30 days of the date of purchase of the cotton;

The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized, and it shall be the Commissioner’s duty, to receive, collect, hold in trust, and disburse all assessments and any other funds created under this article as trust funds of the cotton growers’ organization, without complying with the requirements applicable to funds collected for the use and benefit of the state. Such funds shall not be required to be deposited in the state treasury and appropriated therefrom. All moneys collected by the Commissioner shall be deposited in a bank or other depository approved by the growers’ organization and shall be disbursed by the Commissioner only upon the written authorization of the certified cotton growers’ organization for the administration and implementation of the boll weevil eradication program. Should the eradication program be discontinued or certification of the growers’ organization be revoked by the Commissioner, the assessments authorized by this article shall be discontinued on the date specified by the Commissioner and any funds remaining in its hands at such time are authorized to be paid out by the Commissioner for existing obligations and for winding up the affairs of the certified cotton growers’ organization. Any funds remaining over and above those required for completing the business of the cotton growers’ organization shall be paid by the Commissioner to the contributing growers on a pro rata basis;

Records maintained by the Commissioner on behalf of the certified cotton growers’ organization shall be audited at least annually by the state auditor;

The Commissioner shall have a lien for the payment of assessments under this article which shall be of equal dignity with liens for taxes in favor of the state. The Commissioner is authorized to issue executions for the collection of such assessments in like manner as executions are issued for ad valorem property taxes due the state. It shall be the duty of each and every sheriff of this state and their lawful deputies, upon request of the Commissioner, to levy and collect such executions and to make their return thereof to the Commissioner in like manner as such tax executions are levied and return thereof made to county tax collectors and tax commissioners; provided, however, that the Commissioner shall be authorized to levy and collect his or her own executions;

In addition to the lien provided in paragraph (6) of this Code section, the Commissioner shall have a special lien on cotton for payment of assessments which shall be superior to any other lien provided by law, shall arise as of the time the assessments become due and payable, and shall cover all cotton grown by or ginned from the cotton grower from the date the lien arises until such assessments are paid; provided, however, that any buyers of cotton shall take free of such lien if such buyer has not received written notice of the lien from the Commissioner. Such lien extends to the proceeds of sale received by the person who originally bought the cotton from the grower. Notice may be provided by tagging the cotton as being subject to a delinquency or by documentation in the sales agreement indicating that the cotton is subject to a delinquency. The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative is authorized and empowered to so tag the cotton wherever found. In order to enforce such liens, the Commissioner is authorized to issue an execution for the collection of delinquent assessments due the Commissioner. The execution shall be directed to all and singular sheriffs of this state and shall command them to levy upon the cotton of the cotton grower or notified initial buyer; provided, however, that the Commissioner shall be authorized to levy and collect his or her own executions. Each sheriff or the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative shall execute the execution as in cases of writs of execution from the superior courts. The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative may levy and conduct judicial sales in the manner provided by law for sales by sheriffs and constables. The special lien on cotton may also be enforced by a foreclosure action or action at law, as appropriate, brought by the Commissioner in the superior court of the county of residence of the person who originally bought the cotton from the grower. A buyer of cotton other than a person buying cotton from the grower takes free of the lien created by this paragraph.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-7-156

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1079, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1086, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 5, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 452, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1123, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 439, § 2/SB 43.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “Code section” was substituted for “subsection” in paragraph (7).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 1123, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act is not severable.
In the event any section, subsection, sentence, clause, or phrase of this Act shall be declared or adjudged invalid or unconstitutional, the other sections, subsections, sentences, clauses, or phrases of this Act shall automatically be repealed and Article 5 of Chapter 7 of Title 2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated in effect immediately prior to the enactment of this Act is reenacted as of such date as if this Act had not been enacted.
The General Assembly declares that it would not have passed the remaining parts of this Act if it had known that such part or parts hereof would be declared or adjudged invalid or unconstitutional.” This Act became effective July 1, 1998.

2-7-156.1.
[Repealed] Assessment Advisory Committee created; composition; eligibility of members; duties.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-7-156.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1123, § 3; repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1123, § 3, effective March 24, 2010.

2-7-157.
Prohibited activities.

It shall be unlawful:

To plant cotton in any eradication zone in which planting has been prohibited by the Commissioner;

To alter, forge, counterfeit, or engage in the unauthorized use of any certificate, permit, or other document provided for in this article; or

To store or handle any regulated article in the eradication zone or to move a regulated article into, through, or from the eradication zone in violation of the purposes of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-7-157

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1079, § 1.

2-7-158.
Penalties.

Any person violating any provision of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $50.00 nor more than $1,000.00 or by imprisonment not exceeding 12 months, or both, as determined by the court.

Any cotton grower or the first handler of cotton from a cotton grower who fails to pay any assessment levied under this article when due and upon reasonable notice shall be subject to a penalty of not more than $25.00 per acre or $12.50 per bale, such amount to be established by the Commissioner upon recommendation of the board of directors of the cotton growers’ organization.

Any cotton grower who fails to pay all assessments, including penalties, within 30 days from the date of notice shall be required to destroy all cotton plants growing on his or her property which are subject to assessment. Any plants not destroyed shall be deemed to be a public nuisance. In such case, the Commissioner is authorized to apply to any court of competent jurisdiction and such court shall issue judgment and order condemnation and destruction of such nuisance. The grower shall be liable for all court costs, fees, and other expenses incurred in such action.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-7-158

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1079, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 452, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1123, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 439, § 3/SB 43.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section
28-9-5, in 1986, “12” was substituted for “twelve” in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 1123, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act is not severable.
In the event any section, subsection, sentence, clause, or phrase of this Act shall be declared or adjudged invalid or unconstitutional, the other sections, subsections, sentences, clauses, or phrases of this Act shall automatically be repealed and Article 5 of Chapter 7 of Title 2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated in effect immediately prior to the enactment of this Act is reenacted as of such date as if this Act had not been enacted.
The General Assembly declares that it would not have passed the remaining parts of this Act if it had known that such part or parts hereof would be declared or adjudged invalid or unconstitutional.” This Act became effective July 1, 1998.